Washington statutes.
RCW 18.195.050

Rule making—Effect.

(1) The secretary shall adopt rules necessary to implement the purposes of this chapter. The secretary is specifically directed to adopt rules that maximize competition in the delivery of vision care limited only by the existing scope of practice of the professions and by provisions preventing demonstrated and substantial threats to the public's vision health.

(2) This chapter and the rules adopted by the secretary pursuant to this section shall supersede rules adopted pursuant to chapter 18.34, 18.53, 18.57, or 18.71 RCW that conflict with this chapter. To the extent that, in the secretary's opinion, these rules conflict with the purposes of this chapter, the secretary may declare such rules null and void.

[ 1994 c 106 s 6.]